apertium-nno.nno.dix
<pardef n="tett/_folkesett__adj" c="lt-mwpp TODO">
  <e>       <p><l>are<b/>folkesett</l>       <r><b/>folkesett<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n"> <p><l>are<b/>folkesetts</l>       <r><b/>folkesett<s n="n"/><s n="xcomp"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>folkesett</l>          <r><b/>folkesett<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>folkesett</l>          <r><b/>folkesett<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>folkesette</l>         <r><b/>folkesett<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>folkesette</l>         <r><b/>folkesett<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n"> <p><l><b/>folkesettes</l>         <r><b/>folkesett<s n="n"/><s n="xpsts"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ast<b/>folkesette</l>      <r><b/>folkesett<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n"> <p><l>ast<b/>folkesettes</l>      <r><b/>folkesett<s n="n"/><s n="xsup"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ast<b/>folkesett</l>       <r><b/>folkesett<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="første__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="n"> <p><l>s</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="xpsto"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_def_gen"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="1.__adj" c="no genitives here, avoid «1.s»">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pst"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<!-- /adjectives -->


<pardef n="cardinals">
  <e lm="eitt">            <i>eitt</i></e>
  <e lm="eit">             <i>eit</i></e>
  <e lm="ein">             <i>ein</i></e>
  <e lm="halvanna">        <i>halvanna</i></e>
  <e lm="to">              <i>to</i></e>
  <e lm="to og eit halvt"> <i>to<b/>og<b/>eit<b/>halvt</i></e>
  <e lm="tre">             <i>tre</i></e>
  <e lm="tre og eit halvt"><i>tre<b/>og<b/>eit<b/>halvt</i></e>
  <e lm="fire">            <i>fire</i></e>
  <e lm="fem">             <i>fem</i></e>
  <e lm="seks">            <i>seks</i></e>
  <e lm="sju">             <i>sju</i></e>
  <e lm="åtte">            <i>åtte</i></e>
  <e lm="ni">              <i>ni</i></e>
  <e lm="ti">              <i>ti</i></e>
  <e lm="elleve">          <i>elleve</i></e>
  <e lm="tolv">            <i>tolv</i></e>
  <e lm="tretten">         <i>tretten</i></e>
  <e lm="fjorten">         <i>fjorten</i></e>
  <e lm="femten">          <i>femten</i></e>
  <e lm="seksten">         <i>seksten</i></e>
  <e lm="sytten">          <i>sytten</i></e>
  <e lm="atten">           <i>atten</i></e>
  <e lm="nitten">          <i>nitten</i></e>
  <e lm="tjue">            <i>tjue</i></e>
  <e lm="tjuefem">         <i>tjuefem</i></e>
  <e lm="tretti">          <i>tretti</i></e>
  <e lm="førti">           <i>førti</i></e>
  <e lm="femti">           <i>femti</i></e>
  <e lm="seksti">          <i>seksti</i></e>
  <e lm="sytti">           <i>sytti</i></e>
  <e lm="åtti">            <i>åtti</i></e>
  <e lm="nitti">           <i>nitti</i></e>
  <e lm="hundre">          <i>hundre</i></e>
  <e lm="tusen">           <i>tusen</i></e>
  <e lm="titusen">         <i>titusen</i></e>
  <e lm="millionar">       <i>millionar</i></e>
  <e lm="0-9+ år lang"> <re>[0-9,.½]+</re></e>
</pardef>

	</pardefs>

<e lm="tett folkesett">          <i>tett</i><par n="tett/_folkesett__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tjueniande">	<i>tjueniande</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="tjueåttande">	<i>tjueåttande</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="tjuesjuande">	<i>tjuesjuande</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="tjuefjerde">	<i>tjuefjerde</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="tjuetredje">	<i>tjuetredje</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="tjueandre">	<i>tjueandre</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="milliardte">	<i>milliardte</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="nulte">	<i>nulte</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="tjuefemte">	<i>tjuefemte</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="n-te">	<i>n-te</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="billionte">	<i>billionte</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="trillionte">	<i>trillionte</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="tjuefyrste">	<i>tjuefyrste</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="femtifyrste">	<i>femtifyrste</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="førtifyrste">	<i>førtifyrste</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="sekstifyrste">	<i>sekstifyrste</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="trettifyrste">	<i>trettifyrste</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="nittifyrste">	<i>nittifyrste</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="syttifyrste">	<i>syttifyrste</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="tjueførste">	<i>tjueførste</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="femtiførste">	<i>femtiførste</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="førtiførste">	<i>førtiførste</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="sekstiførste">	<i>sekstiførste</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="trettiførste">	<i>trettiførste</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="nittiførste">	<i>nittiførste</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="syttiførste">	<i>syttiførste</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="tjuesjette">	<i>tjuesjette</i>	<par n="første__adj"/> </e>
<e lm="fyrste">          <i>fyrste</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="første">          <i>f</i><par n="ø_y"/><i>rste</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="andre">           <i>andre</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tredje">		 <i>tredje</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fjerde">          <i>fjerde</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="femte">           <i>femte</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sjette">          <i>sjette</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sjuande">         <i>sjuande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="åttande">         <i>åttande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="niande">          <i>niande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tiande">          <i>tiande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ellevte">         <i>ellevte</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tolvte">          <i>tolvte</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="trettande">       <i>trettande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fjortande">       <i>fjortande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="femtande">        <i>femtande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sekstande">       <i>sekstande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="syttande">        <i>syttande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="attande">         <i>attande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nittande">        <i>nittande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tjuande">         <i>tjuande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="trettiande">         <i>trettiande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="førtiande">         <i>førtiande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="femtiande">         <i>femtiande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sekstiande">         <i>sekstiande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="syttiande">         <i>syttiande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="åttiande">         <i>åttiande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nittiande">         <i>nittiande</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hundrede"> <i>hundrede</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tusende"> <i>tusende</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="millionte"> <i>millionte</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="I">	 <i>I</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="II">	 <i>II</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="III">	 <i>III</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="IV">	 <i>IV</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="V">	 <i>V</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="VI">	 <i>VI</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="VII">	 <i>VII</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="VIII">	 <i>VIII</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="IX">	 <i>IX</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="X">	 <i>X</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="XI">	 <i>XI</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="XII">	 <i>XII</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="XIII">	 <i>XIII</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="XIV">	 <i>XIV</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="XV">	 <i>XV</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="XVI">	 <i>XVI</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="XVII">	 <i>XVII</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="XVIII">	 <i>XVIII</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="XIX">	 <i>XIX</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
<e lm="XX">	 <i>XX</i><par n="første__adj"/></e>
  <e lm="[0-9]+.">         <re>[0-9]+</re><i>.</i><par n="1.__adj"/></e>
